lexd_components/hyx-nouns_lex_suffixbased.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of nouns which are present in Kouyoumdjian's dictionary "A comprehensive dictionary Armenian-English"
### These are nouns which unambiguously belong to a declension class based on suffixes
